Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
A.C.R.C. Notes.

As to Commission for Arkansas' Future, see Acts 1989, No. 810, as amended by Acts 1993, No. 488.

Publisher's Notes.

Acts 1999, No. 1140, §§ 1-4, authorizes the Arkansas Code Revision Commission to make certain name changes affecting the Department of Education, the State Baord of Education, the Department of Workforce Education, the State Board of Workforce Education and Career Opportunities, and the Arkansas Higher Education Coordinating Board, and for other purposes.

Effective Dates.

Acts 1999, No. 1140, § 9: Apr. 6, 1999. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the Eighty-second General Assembly that the name changes contemplated by this act should be made and published at the earliest possible date in order to avoid confusion in the law among the members of the bar and the citizens of Arkansas. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being immediately necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall become effective on the date of its approval by the Governor. If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, it shall become effective on the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill. If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, it shall become effective on the date the last house overrides the veto.”